Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-116.6 Contraceptive services.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each employer group
accident and health or sickness policy, contract, plan, or agreement issued or
renewed in this State on or after January 1, 2000, shall cease to exclude
contraceptive services or supplies for the subscriber or any dependent of the
subscriber who is covered by the policy, subject to the exclusion under section
431:10A-116.7 and the exclusion under section 431:10A-102.5.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), all
policies, contracts, plans, or agreements under subsection (a), that provide
contraceptive services or supplies, or prescription drug coverage, shall not
exclude any prescription contraceptive supplies or impose any unusual copayment,
charge, or waiting requirement for such supplies.

(c) Coverage for oral contraceptives shall
include at least one brand from the monophasic, multiphasic, and the
progestin-only categories. A member shall receive coverage for any other oral
contraceptive only if:

(1) Use of brands covered has resulted in an adverse
drug reaction; or

(2) The member has not used the brands covered and,
based on the member's past medical history, the prescribing health care
provider believes that use of the brands covered would result in an adverse
reaction.

(d) Coverage required by this section shall
include reimbursement to a prescribing health care provider or dispensing
entity for prescription contraceptive supplies intended to last for up to a
twelve-month period for an insured.

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Contraceptive services" means
physician-delivered, physician-supervised, physician assistant-delivered, advanced
practice registered nurse-delivered, nurse-delivered, or pharmacist-delivered
medical services intended to promote the effective use of contraceptive
supplies or devices to prevent unwanted pregnancy.

"Contraceptive supplies" means all
United States Food and Drug Administration-approved contraceptive drugs or
devices used to prevent unwanted pregnancy.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to extend the practice or privileges of any health care provider beyond that
provided in the laws governing the provider's practice and privileges. [L 1993,
c 365, §1; am L 1999, c 267, §2; am L 2003, c 201, §3 and c 212, §73; am L
2016, c 141, §6 and c 205, §2]

Note

Applicability of L 2016, c 205 amendment. L 2016, c 205,
§§4, 5, and 7.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next